Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5557HZ (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2795 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ EARLY 1 CHILDHOOD IOWA STUDY COMMITTEE. 2 1. The department of health and human services shall convene 3 a study committee during the 2026 legislative interim to review 4 the most efficient means to transition home visiting services 5 offered through an early childhood Iowa area, as that term is 6 defined in section 256I.1, to another system based on districts 7 created by the department of health and human services and 8 to implement the transition with minimal disruption to home 9 visitation services. At a minimum, the study committee shall 10 review all of the following: 11 a. The financial and logistical consequences to the early 12 childhood Iowa system and home visitation services. 13 b. The effects on statewide access to services currently 14 provided through early childhood Iowa, including but not 15 limited to the quality of services and the coordination between 16 providers and the department. 17 c. The impact on rural and underserved communities. 18 d. Possible courses of action to transition home visitation 19 services to ensure the early childhood Iowa system remains 20 viable and effective in the long term. 21 2. a. The study committeeâs voting members shall consist 22 of the following: 23 (1) Two members of the senate appointed by the senate 24 majority leader. 25 (2) One member of the senate appointed by the senate 26 minority leader. 27 (3) Two members of the house of representatives appointed 28 by the house majority leader. 29 (4) One member of the house of representatives appointed by 30 the house minority leader. 31 b. The study committeeâs nonvoting members shall consist of 32 the following: 33 (1) Two members of the association of early childhood Iowa 34 area boards and advocates appointed by the association of early 35 -1- LSB 5557HZ (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 2795 childhood Iowa area boards and advocates. 1 (2) Two early childhood Iowa stakeholders appointed by the 2 association of early childhood Iowa area boards and advocates. 3 (3) Two persons with relevant expertise appointed by the 4 association of early childhood Iowa area boards and advocates. 5 (4) Two representatives of the department of health and 6 human services. 7 (5) One representative of the department of education. 8 (6) One representative of the department of workforce 9 development. 10 (7) One representative of the economic development 11 authority. 12 3. The department of health and human services shall 13 cooperate with any formal request for data from the study 14 committee. All personal identifying information shall be 15 redacted prior to submitting the requested data to the study 16 committee. 17 4. The study committee shall engage with early childhood 18 Iowa area boards, persons who provide services through an early 19 childhood Iowa area, and families who receive services through 20 an early childhood Iowa area by means including but not limited 21 to public input sessions throughout the state. 22 5. The study committee shall submit a final report with the 23 study committeeâs findings and recommendations to the general 24 assembly no later than January 8, 2027. 25